Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-3307
Crash or collision; duties.

In the event of a crash or collision:

(1) The automated-driving-system-equipped vehicle shall remain on the scene of the crash or collision and otherwise comply with sections 60-696 to 60-698; and

(2) The owner of the automated-driving-system-equipped vehicle, if capable, or a person on behalf of the automated-driving-system-equipped vehicle owner, shall report any crash or collision as required by section 60-698.

Laws 2018, LB989, § 7.
July 19, 2018